Utah statutes.
17B-2a-818.   Requirements applicable to public transit district contracts.
(1)  If the expenditure required to construct district facilities or works
exceeds:
(a)  $25,000, the construction shall be let as provided in Title 63G, Chapter
6, Utah Procurement Code; and
(b)  $750,000, the construction shall be let as provided in:
(i)  Title 63G, Chapter 6, Utah Procurement Code; and
(ii)  Section 17B-2a-818.5.
(2) (a)  The board of trustees of a public transit district shall advertise
each bid or proposal through public notice as the board determines.
(b)  A notice under Subsection (2)(a) may:
(i)  include publication in:
(A)  a newspaper of general circulation in the district;
(B)  a trade journal; or
(C)  other method determined by the board; and
(ii)  be made at least once, not less than ten days before the expiration of
the period within which bids or proposals are received.
(3) (a)  The board of trustees may, in its discretion:
(i)  reject any or all bids or proposals; and
(ii)  readvertise or give notice again.
(b)  If, after rejecting bids or proposals, the board of trustees determines
and declares by a two-thirds vote of all members present that in the board's
opinion the supplies, equipment, and materials may be purchased at a lower
price in the open market, the board may purchase the supplies, equipment, and
materials in the open market, notwithstanding any provisions requiring
contracts, bids, proposals, advertisement, or notice.
(4)  The board of trustees of a public transit district may let a contract
without advertising for or inviting bids if:
(a)  the board finds, upon a two-thirds vote of all members present, that a
repair, alteration, or other work or the purchase of materials, supplies,
equipment, or other property is of urgent necessity; or
(b)  the district's general manager certifies by affidavit that there is only
one source for the required supplies, equipment, materials, or construction
items.
(5)  If a public transit district retains or withholds any payment on a
contract with a private contractor to construct facilities under this section,
the board shall retain or withhold and release the payment as provided in
Section 13-8-5.
